Maine, session 132, LD745.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §943-C, sub-§4-B is enacted to read:
4-B. Property exempt from sale process requirement. Notwithstanding the sale
process described in subsections 2, 3 and 4-A, a municipality may sell tax-acquired
property in any manner authorized by the municipality's legislative body after the
expiration of the relevant period for commencement of a title action provided by section
946-B, as long as the municipality pays the former owner any excess sale proceeds as
calculated in subsection 3, paragraph C.